lib/dict/lt.aff
SFX T ti      imojo           [sð]ti
SFX T ti      imajam          [sð]ti
SFX T ti      imàjá           [sð]ti
SFX T ti      imuoju          [sð]ti
SFX T ti      imajame         [sð]ti
SFX T zti     simasis         zti
SFX T zti     simojo          zti
SFX T zti     simajam         zti
SFX T zti     simàjá          zti
SFX T zti     simuoju         zti
SFX T zti     simajame        zti
SFX T þti     ðimasis         þti
SFX T þti     ðimojo          þti
SFX T þti     ðimajam         þti
SFX T þti     ðimàjá          þti
SFX T þti     ðimuoju         þti
SFX T þti     ðimajame        þti
SFX T ti      simoji          [^sðzþ]ti
SFX T ti      simosios        [^sðzþ]ti
SFX T ti      simajai         [^sðzþ]ti
SFX T ti      simàjà          [^sðzþ]ti
SFX T ti      simàja          [^sðzþ]ti
SFX T ti      simojoje        [^sðzþ]ti
SFX T ti      simojoj         [^sðzþ]ti
SFX T ti      imoji           [sð]ti
SFX T ti      imosios         [sð]ti
SFX T ti      imajai          [sð]ti
SFX T ti      imàjà           [sð]ti
SFX T ti      imàja           [sð]ti
SFX T ti      imojoje         [sð]ti
SFX T ti      imojoj          [sð]ti
SFX T zti     simoji          zti
SFX T zti     simosios        zti
SFX T zti     simajai         zti
SFX T zti     simàjà          zti
SFX T zti     simàja          zti
SFX T zti     simojoje        zti
SFX T zti     simojoj         zti
SFX T þti     ðimoji          þti
SFX T þti     ðimosios        þti
SFX T þti     ðimajai         þti
SFX T þti     ðimàjà          þti
SFX T þti     ðimàja          þti
SFX T þti     ðimojoje        þti
SFX T þti     ðimojoj         þti
SFX T ti      simieji         [^sðzþ]ti
SFX T ti      simøjø          [^sðzþ]ti
SFX T ti      simiesiems      [^sðzþ]ti
SFX T ti      simuosius       [^sðzþ]ti
SFX T ti      simaisiais      [^sðzþ]ti
SFX T ti      simuosiuose     [^sðzþ]ti
SFX T ti      imieji          [sð]ti
SFX T ti      imøjø           [sð]ti
SFX T ti      imiesiems       [sð]ti
SFX T ti      imuosius        [sð]ti
SFX T ti      imaisiais       [sð]ti
SFX T ti      imuosiuose      [sð]ti
SFX T zti     simieji         zti
SFX T zti     simøjø          zti
SFX T zti     simiesiems      zti
SFX T zti     simuosius       zti
SFX T zti     simaisiais      zti
SFX T zti     simuosiuose     zti
SFX T þti     ðimieji         þti
SFX T þti     ðimøjø          þti
SFX T þti     ðimiesiems      þti
SFX T þti     ðimuosius       þti
SFX T þti     ðimaisiais      þti
SFX T þti     ðimuosiuose     þti
SFX T ti      simosioms       [^sðzþ]ti
SFX T ti      simàsias        [^sðzþ]ti
SFX T ti      simosiomis      [^sðzþ]ti
SFX T ti      simosiose       [^sðzþ]ti
SFX T ti      imosioms        [sð]ti
SFX T ti      imàsias         [sð]ti
SFX T ti      imosiomis       [sð]ti
SFX T ti      imosiose        [sð]ti
SFX T zti     simosioms       zti
SFX T zti     simàsias        zti
SFX T zti     simosiomis      zti
SFX T zti     simosiose       zti
SFX T þti     ðimosioms       þti
SFX T þti     ðimàsias        þti
SFX T þti     ðimosiomis      þti
SFX T þti     ðimosiose       þti

SFX K Y 2
SFX K is      ø               is
SFX K ys      ø               ys

SFX I Y 6
SFX I s       ø               [^dt]is
SFX I is      þiø             dis
SFX I tis     èiø             tis
SFX I ys      iø              [^dt]ys
SFX I ys      þiø             dys
SFX I tys     èiø             tys

SFX H Y 71
SFX H 0       ø               i
SFX H 0       ems             i
SFX H 0       s               [^jr]i
SFX H i       us              ji
SFX H 0       us              eri
SFX H 0       s               uri
SFX H 0       ais             i
SFX H 0       uose            i
SFX H 0       os              i
SFX H 0       oms             i
SFX H 0       as              i
SFX H 0       omis            i
SFX H 0       ose             i
SFX H a       os              lika
SFX H 0       i               lika
SFX H a       oje             lika
SFX H 0       ies             mt
SFX H t       èiai            mt
SFX H 0       á               mt
SFX H 0       imi             mt
SFX H 0       yje             mt
SFX H 0       ys              mt
SFX H t       èiø             mt
SFX H 0       ims             mt
SFX H 0       is              mt
SFX H 0       imis            mt
SFX H 0       yse             mt
SFX H as      o               as
SFX H s       m               as
SFX H as      à               as
SFX H as      u               as
SFX H s       me              as
SFX H s       0               as
SFX H as      os              as
SFX H s       i               as
SFX H as      oje             as
SFX H as      oj              as
SFX H as      i               [^i]as
SFX H èias    ti              èias
SFX H as      ø               as
SFX H as      iems            [^i]as
SFX H èias    tiems           èias
SFX H as      us              as
SFX H s       is              as
SFX H as      uose            as
SFX H as      oms             as
SFX H as      omis            as
SFX H as      ose             as
SFX H 0       is              as
SFX H as      ojo             as
SFX H s       jam             as
SFX H as      àjá             as
SFX H as      uoju            as
SFX H s       jame            as
SFX H as      oji             as
SFX H as      osios           as
SFX H s       jai             as
SFX H as      àjà             as
SFX H as      àja             as
SFX H as      ojoje           as
SFX H as      ojoj            as
SFX H as      ieji            as
SFX H as      øjø             as
SFX H as      iesiems         as
SFX H as      uosius          as
SFX H s       isiais          as
SFX H as      uosiuose        as
SFX H as      osioms          as
SFX H as      àsias           as
SFX H as      osiomis         as
SFX H as      osiose          as

SFX O N 44
SFX O 0       si              i
SFX O 0       uosi            [^dt]i
SFX O i       þiuosi          di
SFX O ti      èiuosi          ti
SFX O 0       esi             i
SFX O 0       mës             i
SFX O 0       tës             i
SFX O 0       ntis            i
SFX O 0       masi            i
SFX O 0       si              [ëo]
SFX O ë       iausi           [^dt]ë
SFX O ë       þiausi          dë
SFX O të      èiausi          të
SFX O o       ausi            o
SFX O ë       eisi            ë
SFX O o       aisi            o
SFX O 0       mës             [ëo]
SFX O 0       tës             [ëo]
SFX O ë       iusis           [^dt]ë
SFX O ë       þiusis          dë
SFX O të      èiusis          të
SFX O o       usis            o
SFX O ë       æsis            ë
SFX O o       æsis            o
SFX O ë       æsi             ë
SFX O o       æsi             o
SFX O ë       iusiosi         ë
SFX O o       usiosi          o
SFX O ë       ymasis          ë
SFX O ë       ymosi           ë
SFX O ë       ymuisi          ë
SFX O ë       ymàsi           ë
SFX O ë       ymusi           ë
SFX O ë       ymesi           ë
SFX O o       imasis          o
SFX O o       imosi           o
SFX O o       imuisi          o
SFX O o       imàsi           o
SFX O o       imusi           o
SFX O o       imesi           o
SFX O ë       ymaisi          ë
SFX O ë       ymøsi           ë
SFX O o       imaisi          o
SFX O o       imøsi           o
