lib/dict/lt.dic
ğaipë/NOSXYqrv
akinti/NRTXafl
akis/IM
ğaknis/KM
aliejavo/NOPXkw
ğalis/IM
ağmenys/KV
aminorûgğtis/IM
áamşinti/NTX
anglis/IM
Antarktis/IM
antruonys/IV
antspaudavo/NOPSXabhkl
apgintis/IM
apimtis/IM
apskritis/IM
aptartis/IM
arinëti/NRTXkw
ateitis/IM
atitiktis/IM
atremtis/IM
atspirtis/IM
ağtuntas/H
ağtuoneri/H
ağtuoni/H
ağtuoniağimtas/H
ağtuoniasdeğimt/H
ağtuoniasdeğimtas/H
ağtuoniasdeğimttûkstantas/H
ağtuoniatûkstantas/H
ağtuoniolika/H
ağtuonioliktas/H
audmenys/KV
audrino/NOPXckow
aukğtëti/NTX
ausis/KM
avis/IM
badë/NOSXYadefijklpqrwx
baltino/NOPXadefhilpx
baniutyti/NTWX
bendratis/IM
bûgğtavo/NOPX
bidzenti/NTXdg
bjauratis/IM
bliûvoti/NTXd
bluşnis/IM
bodi/ENOSXnopqr
brigztelëti/NTX
brûşino/NOPXadefkmqr
bûtis/IMN
buitis/IM
burgzti/NTXbcdefgijklo
cementavo/NOPXdkw
cvingtelëti/NTX
dangstinëjo/NOPXalm
dantis/KV
debesis/KV
dederviniuoti/NTXe
deguonis/IV
dehumanizavo/OPSX
değimt/H
değimtas/H
değimttûkstantas/H
devintas/H
devyneri/H
devyni/H
devyniağimtas/H
devyniasdeğimt/H
devyniasdeğimtas/H
devyniasdeğimttûkstantas/H
devyniatûkstantas/H
devyniolika/H
devynioliktas/H
dşiaustë/NOXYadefjkpw
didşiuoti/NRSTXqr
dislokavo/OPSX
dşiûtis/IM
dygèioti/NTX
ëdmenys/KV
draikaliojo/NOPXam
drebinti/NRSTXfk
drûsti/NTX
dëstinëjo/NOPXkw
duğimtas/H
ëduonis/IV
durys/KM
durstinëti/NTXk
dutûkstantas/H
dvideğimt/H
dvideğimtas/H
dvideğimttûkstantas/H
dvylika/H
dvyliktas/H
ğeğeri/H
egzaminuoti/NTXdf
ğeği/H
ğeğiağimtas/H
ğeğiasdeğimt/H
ğeğiasdeğimtas/H
ğeğiasdeğimttûkstantas/H
ğeğiatûkstantas/H
eikvojo/NOPSXdhkptw
ğeğiolika/H
ğeğioliktas/H
ğerdis/IM
şergti/NRSTXadlmp
ğermenys/KM
erzino/NOPSXcdfjklorvw
ğeğtas/H
gaidrijo/O
gailestauti/NTXa
galvojo/O
gaudinëjo/O
gausëti/NTXf
geleşis/KM
geleşuonys/IV
gelmenys/KM
gerino/NOPSXefkorvw
ginkluoti/NRSTXaehmq
gintis/IM
gyvaèiavo/NOPSX
gleivëti/NTXaj
gliteno/OPSX
grabinëjo/NOPSXfk
graşbyliauti/NTX
grauşatis/IM
grindys/KM
græşinëti/NTX
griozdino/NOPXacefjklm
grûştis/IM
ûgtelëti/NTX
gugino/NOPSX
gvërinti/NTX
ieğkojo/NOPXadfhklrw
ielakğtis/IM
şiesti/NTXej
iltis/IM
ğimtas/DH
imtis/IM
şingtelëti/NTX
inicijavo/O
şiodmenys/KV
iğpaşintis/IM
şirgèioti/NTX
şirniavo/NOPXjv
iğtremtis/IM
èiulbauti/NTX
şyburti/NTX
şymëjo/NOPSXbcefklnorwx
jungtis/IM
juosëti/NTX
kabaravo/NOPXo
kali/ENOSXbdefil
kamantinëti/NTXdf
kapstë/NOPRSXYabcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwx
kartis/DIM
karğtëti/NTXf
këbşdino/OPSX
keleri/H
keli/H
keliolika/H
kelioliktas/H
kempëti/NTXek
kepenys/KM
keri/ENOXabdfhlop
keturi/H
keturiağimtas/H
keturiasdeğimt/H
keturiasdeğimtas/H
keturiasdeğimttûkstantas/H
keturiatûkstantas/H
keturiolika/H
keturioliktas/H
ketveri/H
ketvirtas/H
kietinti/NRTXefklx
kiltis/IM
kirdino/OPSXabcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwx
kirğti/NTXkl
klausti/NRTXadfhlnqr
klibino/NOPXdfp
kliûtis/IM
klupèioti/NTX
kniso/NOPSXadefiklmoru
konsultavo/NOPSXfr
kontuzyti/NTWX
kratë/NOPRSXYabcdefhjklnpqruvwx
kristi/NTXabcdefghijkl
kryptis/IM
krëkino/OPSX
krûtis/KM
kulğis/IM
kuokğtavo/OPSX
kurpinëti/NTX
kvëpino/NOPXdfjv
lamdë/NOSXYadfijklmpuwx
ğlamenti/NTXk
landuonis/IM
ğlaunis/KM
lengvino/NOPSXfqr
liaudëti/NTXk
litavo/NOPSXabcdefhijklmnopqrtvwx
ğlitis/IM
ğlyti/NTUWXbefjk
ğlytis/IM
lokalizavo/NOPSX
makalavo/NOPXdfkw
marinuoti/NTXlx
masturbavo/OPSXfrv
metaduomenys/KV
metmenys/KV
metrikavo/NOPSXckw
mineralëti/NTX
mintis/IM
mitino/NOPXcdei
montavo/NOPSXbcdehjklnopqtvwx
moteris/KM
mulèiuoti/NTX
naikino/NOPSXadefkrw
naktis/KM
neğmenys/KV
neğmuo/KV
nerimastis/IM
neviltis/IM
niekino/NOPXdefkrw
nigzti/NTX
nutartis/IM
obelis/KM
ğokinëjo/NOPXabcdefghijklnpruvx
oponuoti/NTX
padëtis/IM
palaidavo/O
paltis/IM
pasirinktis/IM
pasivedëti/NTX
patartis/IM
penkeri/H
penki/H
penkiağimtas/H
penkiasdeğimt/H
penkiasdeğimtas/H
penkiatûkstantas/H
penkioliktas/H
pertrauktis/DIM
piemenavo/NOPX
pintis/IM
pirğliauti/NTX
pjûtis/IM
pliumpinëti/NTX
èëplojo/NOPXak
prakeiktis/IM
pravirkti/NTX
prieşastis/IM
puğis/KM
puğnis/KM
putinti/NTX
ràşë/NOSXYr
ravëjo/NOPXadeflmq
rûdis/IM
rembëti/NTXck
riedmenys/KV
riğo/NOPSXabcdefhjklmnopqrtvwx
ropoti/NTXbdej
ropuonis/IM
savastis/IM
savino/NOPSXeor
seilëti/NRSTXafjkmrw
septintas/H
septyni/H
septyniasdeğimt/H
septyniasdeğimttûkstantas/H
septyniolika/H
şàsis/KM
skaièiavo/NOPSXabcdefhijklmnopqrtvwx
skanauti/NTXf
skenduonis/IV
skuto/NOPSXacdefijkmpqruvw
skvarbyti/NTWXk
slaptis/IM
smegenys/KM
sëmenys/KV
snieguoti/NRSTXkw
sotis/IM
spirgino/NOPXadfjklrv
spurduliuoti/NTX
Stotis/IM
stovyklauti/NTX
suimtis/IM
sukiojo/NOPSXdefhijklrvw
suodys/IM
susivikruoti/NTX
sutrauktis/IM
tardyti/NTWXd
tarnavo/NOPXabdfilmnprx
tinginti/NTX
tirpdë/NOXYdefjkv
şûtis/IM
tûkstantas/H
trepsenti/NTXfk
triktis/IM
trisdeğimt/H
trisdeğimttûkstantas/H
tritûkstantas/H
tryliktas/H
tupëti/NRSTXbdefikmqvwx
tvanijo/NOPXjv
tëvonis/IV
uşmarğtis/IM
urgztelëti/NTX
usnis/IM
şuvis/KM
vagis/DIV
vaikavo/NOPSXm
şvangèioti/NTX
varinëjo/NOPXdefkl
ğvenkğti/RSTX
vienatis/IM
vienuolika/H
şvilgèiojo/NOPXfr
vinis/IM
ğvinkti/NTXfjk
vokietëti/NTXk
şvëris/IV
